Oklahoma, session 2025, SB734.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 28 O.S. 2021, Section 153, as


amended by Section 2, Chapter 237, O.S.L. 2022 (28 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 153), is amended to read as follows:


Section 153. A. The clerks of the courts shall collect as


costs in every criminal case for each offense of which the defendant


is convicted, irrespective of whether or not the sentence is


deferred, the following flat charges and no more, except for


standing and parking violations and for charges otherwise provided


for by law, which fee shall cover docketing of the case, filing of

Req. No. 1456 Page 1


all papers, issuance of process, warrants, orders, and other


services to the date of judgment:


1. For each defendant convicted of


exceeding the speed limit by at least


one (1) mile per hour but not more than


ten (10) miles per hour, whether charged


individually or conjointly with others...............$77.00


2. For each defendant convicted of a


misdemeanor traffic violation other than


an offense provided for in paragraph 1


or 5 of this subsection, whether charged


individually or conjointly with others...............$98.00


3. For each defendant convicted of a


misdemeanor, other than for driving


under the influence of alcohol or other


intoxicating substance or an offense


provided for in paragraph 1 or 2 of this


subsection, whether charged individually


or conjointly with others............................$93.00


4. For each defendant convicted of a


felony, other than for driving under the


influence of alcohol or other


intoxicating substance, whether charged


individually or conjointly with others..............$103.00

Req. No. 1456 Page 2


5. For each defendant convicted of the


misdemeanor of driving under the


influence of alcohol or other


intoxicating substance, whether charged


individually or conjointly with others..............$433.00


6. For each defendant convicted of the


felony of driving under the influence of


alcohol or other intoxicating substance,


whether charged individually or


conjointly with others..............................$433.00


7. For the services of a court reporter at


each preliminary hearing and trial held


in the case..........................................$20.00


8. For each time a jury is requested....................$30.00


9. A sheriff’s fee for serving or


endeavoring to serve each writ, warrant,


order, process, command, or notice or


pursuing any fugitive from justice


a. within the county.......... $50.00 up to $150.00, or


mileage as


established by the


Oklahoma Statutes,


whichever is


greater, or

Req. No. 1456 Page 3


b. outside of the county...... $50.00 up to $150.00, or


actual, necessary


expenses, whichever


is greater


B. In addition to the amount collected pursuant to paragraphs 2


through 6 of subsection A of this section, the sum of Six Dollars


($6.00) shall be assessed and credited to the Law Library Fund


pursuant to Section 1201 et seq. of Title 20 of the Oklahoma


Statutes.


C. In addition to the amount collected pursuant to subsection A


of this section, the sum of Twenty Dollars ($20.00) shall be


assessed and collected in every traffic case for each offense other


than for driving under the influence of alcohol or other


intoxicating substance; the sum of Thirty Dollars ($30.00) shall be


assessed and collected in every misdemeanor case for each offense;


the sum of Thirty Dollars ($30.00) shall be assessed and collected


in every misdemeanor case for each offense for driving under the


influence of alcohol or other intoxicating substance; the sum of


Fifty Dollars ($50.00) shall be assessed and collected in every


felony case for each offense; and the sum of Fifty Dollars ($50.00)


shall be assessed and collected in every felony case for each


offense for driving under the influence of alcohol or other


intoxicating substance.



Req. No. 1456 Page 4


D. In addition to the amounts collected pursuant to subsections


A and B of this section, the sum of Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00)


shall be assessed and credited to the Oklahoma Court Information


System Revolving Fund created pursuant to Section 1315 of Title 20


of the Oklahoma Statutes.


E. In addition to the amount collected pursuant to paragraphs 1


through 6 of subsection A of this section, the sum of Ten Dollars


($10.00) shall be assessed and credited to the Sheriff’s Service Fee


Account in the county in which the conviction occurred for the


purpose of enhancing existing or providing additional courthouse


security.


F. In addition to the amounts collected pursuant to paragraphs


through 6 of subsection A of this section, the sum of Three


Dollars ($3.00) shall be assessed and credited to the Office of the


Attorney General Victim Services Unit.


G. In addition to the amounts collected pursuant to paragraphs


through 6 of subsection A of this section, the sum of Three


Dollars ($3.00) shall be assessed and credited to the Child Abuse


Multidisciplinary Account. This fee shall not be used for purposes


of hiring or employing any law enforcement officers.


H. In addition to the amount collected pursuant to paragraphs 5


and 6 of subsection A of this section, the sum of Fifteen Dollars


($15.00) shall be assessed in every misdemeanor or felony case for


each offense of driving under the influence of alcohol or other

Req. No. 1456 Page 5


intoxicating substance and credited to the Oklahoma Impaired Driver


Database Revolving Fund created pursuant to Section 11-902d of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes.


I. Prior to conviction, parties in criminal cases shall not be


required to pay, advance, or post security for the issuance or


service of process to obtain compulsory attendance of witnesses.


J. The amounts to be assessed as court costs upon filing of a


case shall be those amounts above-stated in paragraph 3 or 4 of


subsection A and subsections B, C, D and E of this section.


K. The fees collected pursuant to this section shall be


deposited into the court fund, except the following:


1. A court clerk issuing a misdemeanor warrant is entitled to


ten percent (10%) of the sheriff’s service fee, provided for in


paragraph 9 of subsection A of this section, collected on a warrant


referred to the contractor for the misdemeanor warrant notification


program governed by Sections 514.4 and 514.5 of Title 19 of the


Oklahoma Statutes. This ten-percent sum shall be deposited into the


issuing Court Clerk’s Revolving Fund, created pursuant to Section


220 of Title 19 of the Oklahoma Statutes, of the court clerk issuing


the warrant with the balance of the sheriff’s service fee to be


deposited into the Sheriff’s Service Fee Account, created pursuant


to the provisions of Section 514.1 of Title 19 of the Oklahoma


Statutes, of the sheriff in the county in which service is made or


attempted. Otherwise, the sheriff’s service fee, when collected,

Req. No. 1456 Page 6


shall be deposited in its entirety into the Sheriff’s Service Fee


Account of the sheriff in the county in which service is made or


attempted;


2. The sheriff’s fee provided for in Section 153.2 of this


title;


3. The witness fees paid by the district attorney pursuant to


the provisions of Section 82 of this title which, if collected by


the court clerk, shall be transferred to the district attorney’s


office in the county where witness attendance was required. Fees


transferred pursuant to this paragraph shall be deposited in the


district attorney’s maintenance and operating expense account;


4. The fees provided for in subsection C of this section shall


be forwarded to the District Attorneys Council Revolving Fund to


defray the costs of prosecution; and


5. The following amounts of the fees provided for in paragraphs


2, 3, 5 and 6 of subsection A of this section, when collected, shall


be deposited in the Trauma Care Assistance Revolving Fund, created


pursuant to the provisions of Section 1-2530.9 of Title 63 of the


Oklahoma Statutes:


a. Ten Dollars ($10.00) of the Ninety-eight-Dollar fee


provided for in paragraph 2 of subsection A of this


section,





Req. No. 1456 Page 7


b. Ten Dollars ($10.00) of the Ninety-three-Dollar fee


provided for in paragraph 3 of subsection A of this


section,


c. One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) of the Four-Hundred-


Thirty-three-Dollar fee provided for in paragraph 5 of


subsection A of this section, and


d. One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) of the Four-Hundred-


Thirty-three-Dollar fee provided for in paragraph 6 of


subsection A of this section.


L. As used in this section, “convicted” means any final


adjudication of guilt, whether pursuant to a plea of guilty or nolo


contendere or otherwise, and any deferred judgment or suspended


sentence.


M. A court clerk may accept in payment for any fee, fine,


forfeiture payment, cost, penalty assessment or other charge or


collection to be assessed or collected by a court clerk pursuant to


this section a nationally recognized credit card or debit card or


other electronic payment method as provided in paragraph 1 of


subsection B of Section 151 of this title.


N. Upon receipt of payment of fines and costs for offenses


charged prior to July 1, 1992, the court clerk shall apportion and


pay Thirteen Dollars ($13.00) per conviction to the court fund.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.



Req. No. 1456 Page 8


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-1456 TEK 1/19/2025 5:42:14 AM





































Req. No. 1456 Page 9